California statutes. Public Resources Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 231, Sec. 2.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Sec. 25991.10.)
-------------------------------------------

25991.6.

For purposes of this chapter, “stakeholders” includes, but is not limited to, fisheries groups, labor unions, industry, environmental justice organizations, environmental organizations, and other ocean users.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 231, Sec. 2.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Sec. 25991.10.)
-------------------------------------------

25991.7.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to create a technology set-aside or mandatory minimum for any type of eligible renewable energy resource.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 231, Sec. 2.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Sec. 25991.10.)
-------------------------------------------

25991.8.

(a) (1) The commission, in consultation with the State Lands Commission, the Ocean Protection Council, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, the Office of Planning and Research, and the California Coastal Commission, shall develop a second-phase plan and strategy for seaport readiness that builds upon the recommendations and alternatives in the strategic plan for offshore wind energy developments developed
 pursuant to Sections 25991 and 25991.3.

 (2) (A) The commission shall make a draft report, with recommendations for implementation of a port development strategy, available for public review and comment for at least 60 days and shall submit a final report on its recommendations for a seaport readiness strategy to the Governor and the Legislature on or before December 31, 2026.

(B) The plan submitted to the Legislature pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(b) For purposes of the second-phase plan described in subdivision (a), the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Identify feasible seaport locations for offshore wind turbine assembly to serve Central Coast and North Coast offshore wind energy projects.

(2) Recommend and prioritize only port alternatives where site control can be obtained by a port authority or state agency within five years.

(3) Recommend and prioritize alternatives only with sufficient landside and water acreage or capacity to support maximum in-state
 assembly and manufacturing of offshore wind energy components.

(4) Recommend and prioritize port locations that minimize impacts to cultural and natural resources, including the marine and onshore environments, sensitive species, and habitats.

(5) Identify and prioritize ports that maximize in-state workforce opportunities, including workforce opportunities for low-income and environmental justice communities.

(6) Consider transportation and other infrastructure investments needed to develop the identified seaports and waterfront facilities needed for offshore wind energy activities.

(7) Collaborate with tribal governments to develop appropriate seaport
 siting criteria that minimize adverse impacts to natural and cultural resources and maximize economic and workforce benefits to the tribal governments.

(8) Consult with key stakeholders, including, but not limited to, environmental organizations, environmental justice organizations, fisheries groups, labor unions, electric ratepayer advocates, offshore wind energy developers, oceangoing vessel operators, and related industry stakeholders, local governments and public port authorities, and other ocean users, to develop appropriate seaport siting criteria that minimize adverse impacts to cultural and natural resources, minimize adverse impacts to local communities, maximize local and in-state economic and workforce benefits, incorporate equity and
 environmental justice in seaport development, minimize impacts to California electric ratepayers, and avoid delays in the seaport entitlement process.

(9) Collaborate with the oceangoing vessel operator and commercial maritime industry to identify appropriate ocean spatial planning policies and siting criteria that minimize adverse impacts to vessel navigation and maximize maritime safety. The commission shall seek to coordinate and collaborate with the United States Coast Guard for purposes of this paragraph on matters that fall within the Coast Guard’s authority and jurisdiction.

(10) Assess the estimated cost and identify potential funding and financing strategies for necessary port development and redevelopment that support offshore wind energy activities, including the potential to leverage federal funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 314, Sec. 3.   (AB 3)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Sec. 25991.10.)
-------------------------------------------

25991.9.

(a) (1) The commission, in consultation with the California Workforce Development Board, shall conduct a study on the feasibility of achieving 50 percent and
 65 percent in-state assembly and manufacturing of offshore wind energy projects and the domestic content thresholds for offshore wind energy projects, as specified in the federal Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169). The commission may coordinate with the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development for purposes of the study. The commission shall submit a report on the study to the Governor and the Legislature on or before December 31, 2027.

(2) The report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(b) For purposes of the study, the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Assess current manufacturing capabilities within California that are potentially suitable to support the offshore wind energy supply chain and identify the tier one, tier two, and tier three components of the offshore wind energy supply chain that are best suited to in-state manufacturing of offshore wind energy projects.

(2) Identify gaps in the current supply chain and workforce for achieving the in-state assembly and manufacturing targets and domestic content thresholds described in subdivision (a), including identifying the facilities and infrastructure required to meet these in-state assembly thresholds and the estimated geographic distribution of these facilities, and estimating the number, geographic distribution, and types of jobs that will be created.

(3) When
 estimating the number and types of jobs required for achieving the in-state assembly and manufacturing targets and domestic content thresholds described in subdivision (a), include roles in related and supporting activities, including, but not limited to, environmental monitoring, research and development, construction, engineering and design, and manufacturing, operations, and maintenance.

(4) Identify supply chain and workforce investments needed by the state to support achieving the in-state assembly and manufacturing targets and domestic content thresholds described in subdivision (a).

(5) Identify available federal and state funds to support bringing or retaining jobs related to the manufacturing and assembly of offshore wind projects in the state.

(6) Study and estimate the potential impacts on economic activity and job growth, and resulting state tax revenues, resulting from achieving the in-state assembly and manufacturing targets and domestic content thresholds described in subdivision (a).

(7) Study and evaluate any potential impacts to project development timelines and costs as a result of achieving the in-state assembly and manufacturing targets and domestic content thresholds described in subdivision (a).

(8) Study and estimate potential impacts to electric ratepayers as a result of achieving the in-state assembly and manufacturing targets and domestic content
 thresholds described in subdivision (a).

(9) Develop recommendations for incorporating equity and environmental justice in economically and environmentally sustainable supply chain development.

(10) Coordinate with tribal governments to develop recommendations for tribal workforce development opportunities.

(11) Consult with environmental and environmental justice groups, fisheries groups, labor unions, including manufacturing, transportation, maritime, and longshore
 unions, oceangoing vessel operators, the commercial maritime industry, public port authorities, and business groups to develop recommendations for workforce development
 opportunities.

(12) Develop recommendations for workforce development investments at community colleges, by the California Workforce Development Board for maritime and longshore workforces, at state universities, and in apprenticeship programs necessary to meet the workforce needs resulting from the in-state targets described in this section.

(13) Consult with building and construction trades councils to develop recommendations on the use of project labor agreements to achieve workforce development and apprenticeship goals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 314, Sec. 4.   (AB 3)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Sec. 25991.10.)
-------------------------------------------

25991.10.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 25991.8 by Stats. 2023, Ch. 314, Sec. 2.   (AB 3)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 14, commencing with Section 25991.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 15. Voluntary Offshore Wind Program [25992. - 25992.22.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [25992. - 25992.5.]

25992.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The state is committed to the responsible development of wind energy in federal ocean waters off the coast of California and supporting state agencies’ and other entities’ capacity needs in the time period between wind energy areas being leased and lessees submitting construction and operation plans. Under the Federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1451 et seq.), the California Coastal Commission reviews the federal Bureau of Ocean Energy Management consistency determinations for proposed lease sales in federal waters, and consistency certifications for proposed wind development projects, to determine if those activities are consistent with the federally approved California
 Coastal Management Program.

(b) Offshore wind should be developed in a manner that protects coastal and marine ecosystems. The state should use its authority to ensure, as feasible, both of the following:

(1) Avoidance, minimization, and mitigation of significant adverse impacts.

(2) Monitoring and adaptive management for offshore wind projects and their associated infrastructure.

(c) Offshore wind lessees should be encouraged, and required when appropriate, to coordinate and provide relevant survey and monitoring data, implement any relevant best practices or guidelines, assist with identification of research gaps, and develop strategies for monitoring and adaptive management.

(d) Offshore wind lessees engagement with tribal governments and potentially affected communities ensures those governments and communities are part of planning and project-specific decisionmaking related to offshore wind activities, and impacts affecting those governments and communities caused by offshore wind activities are identified and addressed.

(e) Investment in offshore wind energy development can offer career pathways and workforce training in clean energy development. Offshore wind energy will provide additional industrial work opportunities and should provide apprenticeship opportunities for a diverse labor pool, including for local communities experiencing high unemployment, through prioritization of local hiring.

(f) Funding would help accelerate the ability of state agencies to coordinate, conduct needed studies, and otherwise prepare for future
 permitting and review activities related to offshore wind development, including ancillary permitting, such as port and waterfront facility upgrades and other associated infrastructure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 20.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25992.5.

For purposes of this chapter, all of the following definitions apply:

(a) “Account” means the Private Donations Account created pursuant to Section 25992.20.

(b) “Bureau” means the federal Bureau of Ocean Energy Management.

(c) “Eligible entity” means a local community, local government, California tribe, or nonprofit organization selected by California tribes to represent their
 interests, if the entity is geographically, culturally, or economically impacted by the offshore wind industry. A coalition of more than one of these eligible entities is also an eligible entity if each coalition member is also an eligible entity. For purposes of this subdivision, “California tribes” means California Native American tribes identified on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission or a federally recognized tribe, as defined in Section 11019.81 of the Government Code.

(d) “Fund” means the Voluntary Offshore Wind and Coastal Resources Protection Fund created pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25992.20.

(e) “Offshore
 wind entity” means any entity engaged in offshore wind energy development that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) Has a planned generation capacity of 50 megawatts or more.

(2) Engages in development activities expected to impact the coastal environment, marine environment, or human environment, as those terms are defined by Section 1331 of Title 43 of the United States Code, of the California coast or submerged lands.

(3) Will be required to obtain a lease, permit, or other authorization from the State Lands Commission, the California Coastal Commission, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the State Water Resources Control Board, a California regional water quality control board, the State Air Resources Board, the Public Utilities
 Commission, the Independent System Operator, or another state agency or local government, in connection with its development activities.

(f) “Program” means the Voluntary Offshore Wind and Coastal Resources Protection Program established pursuant to Section 25992.10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 397, Sec. 1.   (AB 1417)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Voluntary Offshore Wind and Coastal Resources Protection Program [25992.10. - 25992.11.]

25992.10.

(a) (1) The Voluntary Offshore Wind and Coastal Resources Protection Program is hereby established to be administered by the commission for the purpose of supporting state activities that complement and are in furtherance of federal laws related to the development of offshore wind facilities, including federal laws providing for offshore wind lease conditions of the bureau. The program shall award moneys to public and private entities, including, but not limited to, state agencies, tribal entities, local governmental agencies, research institutions, and nonprofit entities, through various mechanisms, including, but not limited to, grants.

(2) Moneys from the fund
 and account shall be available for allocation by the commission for purposes of this chapter.

(b) The commission may allocate moneys for any of the following:

(1) Increasing the ability of state agencies to engage in postlease assessments and studies of impacts, including surveys and plans, and ongoing review of project compliance and monitoring, including administrative costs.

(2) Research facilitation and coordination, including, but not limited to, funding to support state agencies to work collaboratively with the bureau and other federal, state, and tribal entities to ensure that lessees’ construction and operations plans incorporate strategies and specific plans for comprehensive monitoring and adaptive
 management, and to ensure that the strategies and plans are implemented appropriately, including funding to contract with technical experts to be retained by state agencies to consult and collaborate on strategies and specific plans for comprehensive monitoring and adaptive management.

(3) (A) Contracts with technical experts to assist the bureau and the state in their review of survey and sampling and analysis plans, survey data and analysis, construction and operation plans, and other planning, project development, and project implementation activities and documents.

(B) The purpose of the technical experts is to review current research on survey methodologies, monitoring approaches and technologies, adaptive management strategies, and other relevant topics
 for floating offshore wind, to provide the bureau and the state with recommendations, suggested guidelines, and best practices, and to fulfill additional research needs, during all phases of floating offshore wind development and implementation with the overall goal of avoiding and minimizing impacts to coastal resources.

(4) Environmental impacts monitoring, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Collecting, analyzing, and reporting baseline and postdevelopment environmental data to assess large-scale changes and cumulative impacts to marine species, habitats, and uses from floating offshore wind development and related activities with a goal of enabling the bureau and the state to accurately assess, mitigate, and adaptively manage those impacts.

(B) Data collection at a regional scale that integrates data with information and data provided by lessees or the bureau and other relevant data to provide a comprehensive understanding of how floating offshore wind development is affecting the marine environment and coastal uses.

(5) Infrastructure readiness commitments, including, but not limited to, activities associated with the bureau’s lease requirements for lessees to support infrastructure readiness, such as ports, waterfront facilities, and transmission for floating offshore wind generation facilities.

(6) Workforce development grants consistent with subdivisions (r) to (t), inclusive, of Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code and in consultation
 with the California Workforce Development Board.

(7) Capacity funding activities and grants within local communities and tribal communities. Grants under this paragraph are available only to eligible entities.

(c) Moneys in the fund and the account shall not be allocated by the commission to another state or local agency for that agency’s costs that are otherwise recoverable from project proponents in administering a
 regulatory or entitlement program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 397, Sec. 2.   (AB 1417)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25992.11.

(a) The commission may adopt guidelines or other standards at a commission business meeting to implement this chapter. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the adoption of the guidelines or other standards adopted by the commission to implement this chapter. Before adopting or revising the guidelines or other standards, the commission must provide an opportunity for public comment and at least one public workshop.

(b) The commission may require a form to be submitted and signed under penalty of perjury to carry out the purposes of this chapter. A form shall be adopted in the format and manner prescribed by the
 commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 20.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Voluntary Offshore Wind and Coastal Resources Protection Fund [25992.20. - 25992.22.]

25992.20.

(a) The Voluntary Offshore Wind and Coastal Resources Protection Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year to the commission for purposes of this chapter.

(b) The Private Donations Account is hereby created in the fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the account are hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year to the commission for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 20.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25992.21.

(a) The commission may accept federal and private sector moneys, including for purposes of financial commitments made to fulfill a lessee’s bidding credits in a bureau lease sale auction, for purposes of this chapter. The private sector moneys shall be deposited into the account. The federal moneys shall be deposited into the fund.

(b) Records of the donations received by the commission, or by eligible entities from offshore wind entities, and allocations made pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to public disclosure.

(c) Every 90 days, an offshore wind entity shall report to the commission all of the following:

(1) The aggregate amount of donations made.

(2) The number of groups or tribes that received donations.

(3) The counties where those groups or tribes are based.

(4) The types of eligible entities that received a donation, including, but not limited to, whether the eligible entity is a tribe, community group, local government, or third party.

(d) For each donation made by an offshore wind entity and reported pursuant to subdivision (c), the commission shall post a report on its internet website annually. The report shall only include the following information:

(1) The total amount of donations received by eligible entities from offshore wind entities in the preceding year.

(2) The total amount of donations received by eligible entities from offshore wind entities in each county in the preceding year.

(3) The types of eligible entities that received donations from offshore wind entities in the preceding year.

(4) The number of eligible entities that received a donation from offshore wind entities in the preceding year.

(e) The commission may enter into an agreement with a donor for the purposes for which the donation may be used consistent with this chapter.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 11005 of the Government Code, the Director of Finance’s approval of the donations accepted by the commission under this section is not required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 397, Sec. 3.   (AB 1417)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25992.22.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before March 15, 2024, and each January thereafter concurrent with the submission of the Governor’s Budget, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on the moneys received and allocated pursuant to this chapter. The report shall include, but not be limited to, a description and information on the use of funds, geographic distribution of allocated funds, program activities, and awardees.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the commission shall annually prepare and submit, on or before March 1 of each year, a
 report to the Legislature on the implementation and effectiveness of the capacity funding activities and grants described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 25992.10, including the amount of activity and grant moneys provided by offshore wind entities, using information provided by offshore wind entities, local communities, local governments, and tribes. The report shall include, but not
 be limited to, the total amount of capacity funding activity and grant moneys awarded for purposes of those activities and grants, a description of the activities and grants funded, and an assessment of the impact of the funding.

(c) The report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 397, Sec. 4.   (AB 1417)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 18. Wave Energy and Tidal Energy [25996. - 25996.1.]

25996.

(a) As part of the 2024 energy policy review prepared pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25302, the commission, in consultation with other appropriate state agencies, including, but not limited to, the Ocean Protection Council, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the State Lands Commission, and the California Coastal Commission, shall evaluate the feasibility, costs, and benefits of using wave energy and tidal energy as forms of clean energy in the state.

(b) For purposes of the evaluation identified in subdivision (a), the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Evaluate factors that may contribute to the increased use of wave energy and tidal energy in the state.

(2) Provide findings on the latest research about the technological and economic feasibility of deploying offshore wave and tidal energy in the state.

(3) Evaluate wave energy and tidal energy project potential transmission needs and permitting requirements.

(4) Evaluate wave energy and tidal energy project economic and workforce development needs.

(5) Identify near-term actions, particularly related to investments and the workforce for wave energy and tidal energy projects, to maximize job creation and economic development, while considering affordable electric rates and bills.

(6) Identify a robust monitoring strategy designed to gather sufficient data to evaluate the impacts from wave
 energy and tidal energy projects to marine and tidal ecosystems and affected species, including, but not limited to, fish, marine mammals, and aquatic plants, to inform adaptive management of the projects.

(c) (1) The commission, in coordination and consultation with the California Coastal Commission, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Ocean Protection Council, and the State Lands Commission, shall work with other state and local agencies, the offshore wave energy and tidal energy industry, the commercial and recreational fishing communities, California Native American tribes, nongovernmental organizations, and other stakeholders to identify suitable sea space for offshore wave energy and tidal energy projects in state and federal waters.

(2) For purposes of identifying suitable sea space, the commission shall consider all of the following:

(A) Existing data and information on offshore wave energy and tidal energy resource potential and commercial viability.

(B) Existing transmission facilities and infrastructure, and necessary additional transmission facilities and infrastructure.

(C) Protection of cultural and biological resources with the goal of prioritizing ocean areas that pose the least conflict to those resources.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the commission shall incorporate the information developed by the federal Bureau of Ocean Energy Management’s California Intergovernmental Renewable Energy Task Force, as applicable.

(4) The commission, in coordination and consultation with the California Coastal
 Commission, Department of Fish and Wildlife, Ocean Protection Council, State Lands Commission, other state and local agencies, the offshore wind energy industry, the commercial and recreational fishing communities, California Native American tribes, nongovernmental organizations, and other stakeholders, shall identify measures that would avoid, minimize, and mitigate significant adverse environmental and ecosystem impacts and use conflicts, and for monitoring and adaptive management for offshore wave energy and tidal energy projects, consistent with California’s long-term goals relating to renewable energy, reduction of greenhouse gas emissions, and biodiversity.

(5) Nothing in this subdivision modifies the authority of any state agency over project-specific siting and permitting.

(6) The commission shall seek to coordinate and consult with federal agencies, as appropriate and
 applicable, in performing the work required by this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 405, Sec. 1.   (SB 605)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

25996.1.

(a) On or before January 1, 2025, the commission shall submit a written report to the Governor and the Legislature that includes both of the following:

(1) A summary and findings from the evaluation and work described in Section 25996.

(2) Considerations that may inform legislative and executive actions to facilitate, encourage, and promote the development and increased use of technologically and economically feasible wave energy and tidal energy technologies, infrastructure, and facilities in the state.

(b) (1) The report described in this section shall be submitted to the Legislature
 pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 405, Sec. 1.   (SB 605)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 19. Fusion Research and Development Innovation Initiative [25997. - 25997.7.]

25997.

For purposes of this chapter, all of the following definitions apply:

(a) “Financial incentive” includes a contract, grant, loan, or other appropriate funding mechanism.

(b) “Fusion” means a reaction in which at least one heavier, more stable
 nucleus is produced from at least one lighter, less stable nucleus, typically through high temperatures and pressures, and emitting energy as a result.

(c) “Fusion energy” means the product of fusion reactions inside a fusion device that is used to generate electricity or other commercially usable forms of energy.

(d) “Initiative” means the Fusion Research and Development Innovation Initiative established pursuant to Section 25997.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 334, Sec. 2.   (SB 80)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative on date prescribed by Section 25997.5.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25997.7.)
-------------------------------------------

25997.1.

(a) (1) The Fusion Research and Development Innovation Initiative is hereby established within the commission to accelerate the development and growth of fusion energy by advancing fusion science and technology.

(2) The commission, in consultation with the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development and the Public Utilities Commission, shall establish and administer the initiative to provide financial incentives for projects that advance technologies for fusion energy benefiting California.

(b) The commission may refer to the federal Fusion Energy Sciences Advisory Committee’s (FESAC) Powering the Future: Fusion & Plasmas long-range plan and the 2024 draft report of the FESAC
 Subcommittee on Facilities Construction Projects to determine the highest priority capabilities.

(c) The commission may adopt guidelines governing the award, eligibility, and administration of funding pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 334, Sec. 2.   (SB 80)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative on date prescribed by Section 25997.5.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25997.7.)
-------------------------------------------

25997.3.

(a) The commission shall provide financial incentives pursuant to Section 25997.1 for any of the following:

(1) To advance research and development in fusion energy and support the establishment or expansion of testing
 facilities addressing gaps in fusion science and technology.

(2) To accelerate the deployment of new research and technology capabilities that support the commercialization of fusion energy.

(3) To achieve the
 initiative’s goal of delivering the world’s first fusion energy pilot
 project in the state by the 2040s.

(b) In administering the initiative, the commission may do all of the following:

(1) Solicit applicants and award financial incentives using a competitive award process. The commission may noncompetitively award follow-on financial incentives to awardees of a prior competitive award process.

(2) Use the competitive award process of another organization to award funds or provide follow-on funding for an entity previously selected through
 a competitive award process for the purposes of attracting significant federal or private funding for the projects or of accelerating the delivery of program benefits.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, noncompetitively award financial incentives to an entity that will use the moneys as matching funds for federally awarded moneys.

(4) Noncompetitively award financial incentives to national laboratories and any public entities.

(5) Noncompetitively award financial incentives to any entity when the
 cost to the state is reasonable and the commission makes any of the following determinations:

(A) The expertise, service, or product is unique.

(B) A competitive solicitation would frustrate obtaining necessary information, goods, or services in a timely manner.

(C) When it is determined by the commission to be in the best interests of the state.

(c) The commission shall not noncompetitively award funds pursuant to this chapter unless both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The commission, at least 60 days before taking an action pursuant to this chapter, notifies the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the relevant policy committees in both houses of the Legislature, in writing, of its intent to take the proposed actions.

(2) The Joint Legislative Budget Committee either approves or does not disapprove the proposed action within 60 days from the date of notification required by paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 334, Sec. 2.   (SB 80)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative on date prescribed by Section 25997.5.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25997.7.)
-------------------------------------------

25997.5.

(a) This chapter shall be liberally construed to maximize the commission’s ability to utilize and award federal funds expeditiously and in accordance with federal law.

(b) This chapter shall become operative, and its implementation is
 contingent, upon an appropriation for its purposes in the annual Budget Act or another act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 334, Sec. 2.   (SB 80)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25997.7.)
-------------------------------------------

25997.7.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 334, Sec. 2.   (SB 80)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative on date prescribed by Section 25997.5.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Ch. 19, commencing with Section 25997.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 16. CALIFORNIA ALTERNATIVE ENERGY AND ADVANCED TRANSPORTATION FINANCING AUTHORITY ACT [26000. - 26082.]



CHAPTER 1. California Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority [26000. - 26037.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [26000. - 26003.]

26000.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1218, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

26001.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares both of the following:

(a) It is essential that the state, in cooperation with the federal government, use all practical and commercially feasible means to promote the prompt and efficient development of energy sources which are renewable or which more efficiently utilize and conserve scarce energy resources.

(b) The promotion of sustainable and renewable energy sources, implementation of measures that increase the efficiency of the use of energy, and advanced transportation technologies that reduce the degradation of the environment and lessen the state’s dependence
 of fossil fuels, and protect the health, welfare, and safety of the people of this state are in the public interest and serve a public purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 677, Sec. 2.   (SB 1128)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

26002.

It is the purpose of this division to advance the state’s goals of reducing the levels of greenhouse gas emissions, increasing the deployment of sustainable and renewable energy sources, implementing measures that increase the efficiency of the use of energy, creating high quality employment opportunities, and lessening the state’s dependence on fossil fuels and to that end to provide an alternative method of financing in providing and promoting the establishment of both of the following:

(a) Facilities utilizing alternative methods and sources of energy.

(b) Facilities needed for the development and
 commercialization of advanced transportation technologies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 677, Sec. 4.   (SB 1128)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

26002.5.

This division is necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, and shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 908, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

26003.

(a) As used in this division, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) (A) “Advanced manufacturing” means manufacturing processes that improve existing or create entirely new materials,
 products, and processes through the use of science, engineering, or information technologies, high-precision tools and methods, a high-performance workforce, and innovative business or organizational models utilizing any of the following technology areas:

(i) Microelectronics and nanoelectronics, including semiconductors.

(ii) Advanced materials.

(iii) Integrated computational materials engineering.

(iv) Nanotechnology.

(v) Additive manufacturing.

(vi) Industrial biotechnology.

(B) “Advanced manufacturing” includes any of the following:

(i) Systems that result from substantive advancement, whether incremental or breakthrough, beyond the current industry standard, in the production of materials and products. These advancements include improvements in manufacturing processes and systems that are often referred to as “smart” or “intelligent” manufacturing systems, which integrate computational predictability and operational efficiency.

(ii) (I) Sustainable manufacturing systems and manufacturing technologies that minimize the use of resources while maintaining or improving cost and performance.

(II) Sustainable manufacturing systems and manufacturing technologies do